Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska88-546
License; suspension or revocation; procedure.

The commission may, upon complaint filed by it or any person and after a hearing, suspend or revoke the license of any warehouse licensee for failure to comply with the requirements of the Grain Warehouse Act or any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated pursuant to such act. The complaint shall state the grounds for suspension or revocation and shall be filed with the commission pursuant to the commission's rules of procedure. The commission shall serve the warehouse licensee with a copy of the complaint and a copy of the order of the commission stating the time for hearing, which time shall be at least twenty days from the date of service. If the commission determines that the public good requires it, the commission may, upon the filing of a complaint and without hearing, temporarily suspend a license pending the determination of the complaint.

Laws 1987, LB 164, § 22.